California statutes. Penal Code
(x) The Law Enforcement Branch of the Office of Emergency Services.

(xi) The California State Lottery.

(xii) The Franchise Tax Board.

(B) This paragraph does not authorize the sale to, or purchase by, sworn members of the entities specified in subparagraph (A) in a personal capacity.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 26825, a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall not process the sale or transfer of an unsafe handgun between a person who has obtained an unsafe
 handgun pursuant to an exemption specified in paragraph (6) or (7) of subdivision (b) and a person who is not exempt from the requirements of this section.

(2) (A) A person who obtains or has use of an unsafe handgun pursuant to paragraph (6) or (7) of subdivision (b) shall, when leaving the handgun in an unattended vehicle, lock the handgun in the vehicle’s trunk, lock the handgun in a locked container and place the container out of plain view, or lock the handgun in a locked container that is permanently affixed to the vehicle’s interior and not in plain view.

(B) A violation of subparagraph (A) is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) A vehicle is “unattended” when a person who is lawfully carrying or transporting a handgun in the vehicle is not within close proximity to the vehicle to reasonably prevent unauthorized access to the vehicle or its contents.

(iii) “Locked container” has the same meaning as defined in Section 16850.

(D) Subparagraph (A) does not apply to a peace officer during circumstances requiring immediate aid or action that are within the course of their official duties.

(E) This paragraph does not supersede any local ordinance that regulates the storage of handguns in unattended vehicles if the ordinance was in effect
 before January 1, 2017.

(d) Violations of subdivision (a) are cumulative with respect to each handgun and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and other provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision, but the penalty to be imposed shall be determined as set forth in Section 654.

(e) (1) The Department of Justice shall maintain a database of unsafe handguns obtained pursuant to paragraph (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b). This requirement shall apply retroactively to include information in the department’s possession. The department may satisfy this requirement by maintaining this information in any existing firearm database that reasonably facilitates compliance with this subdivision.

(2) A person or entity that is in possession of an unsafe handgun obtained pursuant to paragraph (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b), shall notify the department of any sale or transfer of that handgun within 72 hours of the sale or transfer in a manner and format prescribed by the department. This requirement shall be deemed satisfied if the sale or transfer is processed through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Section 27545. A sale or transfer accomplished through an exception to Section 27545 is not exempt from this reporting requirement.

(3) By no later than March 1, 2021, the department shall provide a notification to persons or entities possessing an unsafe handgun pursuant to paragraph (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b) regarding the prohibitions on the sale or transfer of that handgun contained in this section. Thereafter, the department shall, upon notification of sale
 or transfer, provide the same notification to the purchaser or transferee of any unsafe handgun sold or transferred pursuant to those provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 206.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32005.

(a) Every person who is licensed as a manufacturer of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and who manufactures firearms in this state shall certify under penalty of perjury and any other remedy provided by law that every model, kind, class, style, or type of pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person that the person manufactures is not an unsafe handgun as prohibited by Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive.

(b) Every person who imports into the state for sale, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale any firearm shall certify under penalty of perjury and any other remedy provided by law that
 every model, kind, class, style, or type of pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person that the person imports, keeps, or exposes for sale is not an unsafe handgun as prohibited by Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32010.

(a) Any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person manufactured in this state, imported into the state for sale, kept for sale, or offered or exposed for sale, shall be tested within a reasonable period of time by an independent laboratory certified pursuant to subdivision (b) to determine whether that pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person meets or exceeds the standards defined in Section 31910.

(b) On or before October 1, 2000, the Department of Justice shall certify laboratories to verify compliance with the standards defined in Section 31910. The department may charge a fee to certify a laboratory to test any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person
 pursuant to Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive. The fee shall not exceed the costs of certification.

(c) The certified testing laboratory shall, at the manufacturer’s or importer’s expense, test the firearm and submit a copy of the final test report directly to the Department of Justice along with a prototype of the weapon to be retained by the department. The department shall notify the manufacturer or importer of its receipt of the final test report and the department’s determination as to whether the firearm tested may be sold in this state.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2006, no center-fire semiautomatic pistol may be submitted for testing pursuant to Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive, if it does not have either a chamber load indicator, or a magazine disconnect mechanism if it has a detachable magazine.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2007, no center-fire semiautomatic pistol may be submitted for testing pursuant to Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive, if it does not have both a chamber load indicator and a magazine disconnect mechanism.

(3) Commencing January 1, 2006, no rimfire semiautomatic pistol may be submitted for testing pursuant to Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive, if it has a detachable magazine, and does not have a magazine disconnect mechanism.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 11.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32015.

(a) On and after January 1, 2001, the Department of Justice shall compile, publish, and thereafter maintain a roster listing all of the handguns that have been tested by a certified testing laboratory, have been determined not to be unsafe handguns, and may be sold in this state pursuant to this part. The roster shall list, for each firearm, the manufacturer, model number, and model name.

(b) (1) The
 department may charge every person in this state who is licensed as a manufacturer of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, and any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state for sale, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale any handgun in this state, an annual fee not exceeding the costs of preparing, publishing, and maintaining the roster pursuant to subdivision (a) and the costs of research and development, report analysis, firearms storage, and other program infrastructure costs necessary to implement Sections 31900 to 32110,
 inclusive. Commencing January 1, 2015, the annual fee shall be paid on January 1, or the next business day, of every year.

(2) Any handgun that is manufactured by a manufacturer who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state for sale, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale any handgun in this state, and
 who fails to pay any fee required pursuant to paragraph (1), may be excluded from the roster.

(3) If a purchaser has initiated a transfer of a handgun that is listed on the roster as not unsafe, and prior to the completion of the transfer, the handgun is removed from the roster of not unsafe handguns because of failure to pay the fee required to keep that handgun listed on the roster, the handgun shall be deliverable to the purchaser if the purchaser is not otherwise prohibited from purchasing or possessing the handgun. However, if a purchaser has initiated a transfer of a handgun that is listed on the roster as not unsafe, and prior to the completion of the transfer, the handgun is removed from the roster pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 32020, the handgun shall not be deliverable to the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 758, Sec. 4.   (SB 363)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

32020.

(a) The Attorney General may annually retest up to 5 percent of the handgun models that are listed on the roster described in subdivision (a) of Section 32015.

(b) The retesting of a handgun model pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conform to the following:

(1) The Attorney General shall obtain from retail or wholesale sources, or both, three samples of the handgun model to be retested.

(2) The Attorney General shall select the certified laboratory to be used for the retesting.

(3) The ammunition used
 for the retesting shall be of a type recommended by the manufacturer in the user manual for the handgun. If the user manual for the handgun model makes no ammunition recommendation, the Attorney General shall select the ammunition to be used for the retesting. The ammunition shall be of the proper caliber for the handgun, commercially available, and in new condition.

(c) The retest shall be conducted in the same manner as the testing prescribed in Sections 31900 and 31905.

(d) If the handgun model fails retesting, the Attorney General shall remove the handgun model from the roster maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32025.

A handgun model removed from the roster pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 32020 may be reinstated on the roster if all of the following are met:

(a) The manufacturer petitions the Attorney General for reinstatement of the handgun model.

(b) The manufacturer pays the Department of Justice for all of the costs related to the reinstatement testing of the handgun model, including the purchase price of the handguns, prior to reinstatement testing.

(c) The reinstatement testing of the handguns shall be in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 32020.

(d) The three handgun samples shall be tested only once for reinstatement. If the sample fails it may not be retested.

(e) If the handgun model successfully passes testing for reinstatement, and if the manufacturer of the handgun is otherwise in compliance with Sections 31900 to 32110, inclusive, the Attorney General shall reinstate the handgun model on the roster maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32015.

(f) The manufacturer shall provide the Attorney General with the complete testing history for the handgun model.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 32020, the Attorney General may, at any time, further retest any handgun model that has been reinstated to the roster.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32030.

(a) A firearm shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 32015 if another firearm made by the same manufacturer is already listed and the unlisted firearm differs from the listed firearm only in one or more of the following features:

(1) Finish, including, but not limited to, bluing, chrome-plating, oiling, or engraving.

(2) The material from which the grips are made.

(3) The shape or texture of the grips, so long as the difference in grip shape or texture does not in any way alter the dimensions, material, linkage, or functioning of
 the magazine well, the barrel, the chamber, or any of the components of the firing mechanism of the firearm.

(4) Any other purely cosmetic feature that does not in any way alter the dimensions, material, linkage, or functioning of the magazine well, the barrel, the chamber, or any of the components of the firing mechanism of the firearm.

(b) Any manufacturer seeking to have a firearm listed under this section shall provide to the Department of Justice all of the following:

(1) The model designation of the listed firearm.

(2) The model designation of each firearm that the manufacturer seeks to have listed under this section.

(3) A statement, under oath, that each unlisted firearm for which
 listing is sought differs from the listed firearm only in one or more of the ways identified in subdivision (a) and is in all other respects identical to the listed firearm.

(c) The department may, in its discretion and at any time, require a manufacturer to provide to the department any model for which listing is sought under this section, to determine whether the model complies with the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exceptions to Rules Governing Unsafe Handguns [32100. - 32110.]

32100.

(a) Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall not apply to a single-action revolver that has at least a five-cartridge capacity with a barrel length of not less than three inches, and meets any of the following specifications:

(1) Was originally manufactured prior to 1900 and is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Has an overall length measured parallel to the barrel of at least seven and one-half inches when the handle, frame or receiver, and barrel are assembled.

(3) Has an overall length measured parallel to the barrel of
 at least seven and one-half inches when the handle, frame or receiver, and barrel are assembled and that is currently approved for importation into the United States pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of Section 925 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall not apply to a single-shot pistol with a break top or bolt action and a barrel length of not less than six inches and that has an overall length of at least 10½ inches when the handle, frame or receiver, and barrel are assembled. However, Article 4 (commencing with Section
 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall apply to a semiautomatic pistol that has been temporarily or permanently altered so that it will not fire in a semiautomatic mode.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   (AB 1964)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32103.

(a) A pistol may be submitted for testing described in Section 32010 and added to the roster described in subdivision (a) of Section 32015 without being subject to the requirements of subparagraph (D) or (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 31910, or the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 32010, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The pistol was listed on the roster, described in subdivision (a) of Section 32015, on January 1, 2026.

(2) The pistol was not subject to the requirements of subparagraph (D) or (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 31910 because it was submitted for testing before the dates identified in subdivision (d)
 of Section 32010.

(3) The pistol was thereafter only modified to change design features which brought the pistol within the definition of machinegun-convertible pistol in Section 16885.

(4) The modified pistol is submitted to an independent certified laboratory for testing pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) of Chapter 4 before January 1, 2027.

(b) Any firearm meeting the requirements of this section shall be removed from the roster according to subdivision (b) of Section 31910 on the same timeline as the pistol that appeared on the roster prior to being modified pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 7.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

32105.

(a) The Legislature finds a significant public purpose in exempting pistols that are designed expressly for use in Olympic or Paralympic target shooting events. Therefore, those pistols that are sanctioned by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028, the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or
 by USA Shooting, the national governing body for international shooting competition in the United States, and that fall within the definition of “unsafe handgun” pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 31910 shall be exempt, as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall not apply to any of the following pistols, because they are consistent with the significant public purpose expressed in subdivision (a):MANUFACTURERMODELCALIBERANSCHUTZFP.22LRBENELLIMP90.22LRBENELLIMP90.32 S&W LONGBENELLIMP95.22LRBENELLIMP95.32 S&W LONGDRULOVFP.22LRGREENELECTROARM.22LRHAMMERLI100.22LRHAMMERLI101.22LRHAMMERLI102.22LRHAMMERLI162.22LRHAMMERLI280.22LRHAMMERLI280.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLIFP10.22LRHAMMERLIMP33.22LRHAMMERLISP20.22LRHAMMERLISP20.32 S&W LONGMORINICM102E.22LRMORINI22M.22LRMORINI32M.32 S&W LONGMORINICM80.22LRPARDINIGP.22
 SHORTPARDINIGPO.22 SHORTPARDINIGP-SCHUMANN.22 SHORTPARDINIHP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIK22.22LRPARDINIMP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIPGP75.22LRPARDINISP.22LRPARDINISPE.22LRSAKOFINMASTER.22LRSTEYRFP.22LRVOSTOKIZH NO. 1.22LRVOSTOKMU55.22LRVOSTOKTOZ35.22LRWALTHERFP.22LRWALTHERGSP.22LRWALTHERGSP.32 S&W LONGWALTHEROSP.22 SHORTWALTHEROSP-2000.22 SHORT(c) The department shall create a program that is consistent with the purpose stated in subdivision (a) to exempt new models of competitive
 pistols from Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000). The exempt competitive pistols may be based on recommendations by USA Shooting consistent with the regulations contained in the USA Shooting Official Rules or may be based on the recommendation or rules of any other organization that the department deems relevant.

(d) (1) By June 30, 2028, the Department of Justice shall supplement the list of exempted pistols in subdivision (c) to exempt new models of pistols anticipated to be utilized in the 2028 Olympic or Paralympic Games.

(2) The department shall supplement the list of exempted pistols pursuant to paragraph (1) in coordination with, and promptly after receipt of any sufficient recommendation from, the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028. The Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028 shall provide any sufficient recommendations to the department by June 19, 2028.

(3) Neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) divest the Department of Justice of its independent authority to evaluate or render a decision regarding any sufficient recommendation submitted by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028. To the extent that it does not conflict with the other provisions of this section, a sufficient
 recommendation may be approved, and the list of exempted pistols described in subdivision (c) may be appropriately updated.

(e) For the purposes of subdivision (d), a sufficient recommendation shall include all of the following:

(1) Be signed and dated by either the chief executive officer or chief operating officer of the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028.

(2) Specify the make, model, and caliber of the pistol.

(3) Include a statement that the pistol is sanctioned by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028, the International Olympic Committee, or the International Paralympic Committee in an Olympic or Paralympic target shooting competition.

(4) Include a statement that the pistol is or will be used for Olympic or Paralympic target shooting purposes.

(f) Regulations adopted to implement subdivisions (d) or (e) are emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, safety, and welfare.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 8.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

32105.

(a) The Legislature finds a significant public purpose in exempting pistols that are designed expressly for use in Olympic or Paralympic target shooting events. Therefore, those pistols that are sanctioned by the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or by USA Shooting, the national governing body for international shooting competition in the United States, and that fall within the definition of “unsafe handgun” pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 31910 shall be exempt, as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall not apply to any of the following pistols, because they are consistent with the
 significant public purpose expressed in subdivision (a):MANUFACTURERMODELCALIBERANSCHUTZFP.22LRBENELLIMP90.22LRBENELLIMP90.32 S&W LONGBENELLIMP95.22LRBENELLIMP95.32 S&W LONGDRULOVFP.22LRGREENELECTROARM.22LRHAMMERLI100.22LRHAMMERLI101.22LRHAMMERLI102.22LRHAMMERLI162.22LRHAMMERLI280.22LRHAMMERLI280.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLIFP10.22LRHAMMERLIMP33.22LRHAMMERLISP20.22LRHAMMERLISP20.32 S&W LONGMORINICM102E.22LRMORINI22M.22LRMORINI32M.32 S&W LONGMORINICM80.22LRPARDINIGP.22 SHORTPARDINIGPO.22 SHORTPARDINIGP-SCHUMANN.22 SHORTPARDINIHP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIK22.22LRPARDINIMP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIPGP75.22LRPARDINISP.22LRPARDINISPE.22LRSAKOFINMASTER.22LRSTEYRFP.22LRVOSTOKIZH NO. 1.22LRVOSTOKMU55.22LRVOSTOKTOZ35.22LRWALTHERFP.22LRWALTHERGSP.22LRWALTHERGSP.32 S&W LONGWALTHEROSP.22 SHORTWALTHEROSP-2000.22 SHORT(c) The department shall create a program that is consistent with the purpose stated in subdivision (a) to exempt new models of competitive pistols from Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000). The exempt competitive pistols may be based on recommendations by USA Shooting consistent with the regulations contained in the USA Shooting Official Rules or may be based on the recommendation or rules of any other organization that the department deem relevant.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 9.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32110.

Article 4 (commencing with Section 31900) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 32000) shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) The sale, loan, or transfer of any firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050) of Division 6 in order to comply with Section 27545.

(b) The sale, loan, or transfer of any firearm that is exempt from the provisions of Section 27545 pursuant to any applicable exemption contained in Article 2 (commencing with Section 27600) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 27850) of Chapter 4 of Division 6, if the sale, loan, or transfer complies with the requirements of that applicable exemption to
 Section 27545.

(c) The sale, loan, or transfer of any firearm as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 32000.

(d) The delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, for the purposes of the service or repair of that firearm.

(e) The return of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, to its owner where that firearm was initially delivered in the circumstances set forth in subdivision (a), (d), (f), (i), (l), or (m).

(f) The
 delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, for the purpose of a
 consignment sale or as collateral for a pawnbroker loan.

(g) The sale, loan, or transfer of any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person listed as a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) The sale, loan, or transfer of any semiautomatic pistol that is to be used solely as a prop during the course of a motion picture, television, or video production by an authorized participant therein in the course of making that production or event or by an authorized employee or agent of the entity producing that production or event.

(i) The delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person to a
 person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, where the firearm is being loaned by the licensee to a consultant-evaluator.

(j) The delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, where the firearm is being loaned by the licensee to a consultant-evaluator.

(k) The return of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, where it was initially delivered pursuant to subdivision (j).

(l) The delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person to a person
 licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, for the purposes of storage of that firearm pursuant to Section 26892 or 29830.

(m) The delivery of a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, to a person other than the owner pursuant to Section 26892.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 251, Sec. 10.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Large-Capacity Magazine [32310. - 32455.]



  ARTICLE 1. Rules Governing Large-Capacity Magazines [32310. - 32390.]

32310.

(a) Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 32400) of this chapter and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, buys, or receives any large-capacity magazine is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) For purposes of this section, “manufacturing” includes both fabricating a magazine and assembling a magazine from a combination of parts, including, but not limited to, the body, spring, follower, and floor plate or end plate, to be a fully functioning
 large-capacity magazine.

(c) Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 32400) of this chapter and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, commencing July 1, 2017, any person in this state who possesses any large-capacity magazine, regardless of the date the magazine was acquired, is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per large-capacity magazine, or is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per large-capacity magazine, by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Any person who may not lawfully possess a large-capacity magazine commencing July 1, 2017 shall, prior to July 1, 2017:

(1) Remove the large-capacity magazine
 from the state;

(2) Sell the large-capacity magazine to a licensed firearms dealer; or

(3) Surrender the large-capacity magazine to a law enforcement agency for destruction.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.1.)
-------------------------------------------

32311.

(a) Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 32400) of this chapter and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, commencing January 1, 2014, any person in this state who knowingly manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, buys, or receives any large capacity magazine conversion kit is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. This section does not apply to a fully assembled large-capacity magazine, which is governed by Section 32310.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “large capacity magazine conversion kit” is a device or combination of parts of a fully functioning large-capacity magazine, including, but not limited to, the body, spring, follower, and floor plate or end plate, capable of converting an ammunition feeding device into a large-capacity magazine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

32315.

Upon a showing that good cause exists, the Department of Justice may issue permits for the possession, transportation, or sale between a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and an out-of-state client, of large-capacity magazines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32390.

Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 32400) of this chapter and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any large-capacity magazine is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions Relating Specifically to Large-Capacity Magazines  [32400. - 32455.]

32400.

Section 32310 does not apply to the sale of, giving of, lending of, possession of, importation into this state of, or purchase of, any large-capacity magazine to or by any federal, state, county, city and county, or city agency that is charged with the enforcement of any law, for use by agency employees in the discharge of their official duties, whether on or off duty, and where the use is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.2.)
-------------------------------------------

32405.

Section 32310 does not apply to the sale to, lending to, transfer to, purchase by, receipt of, possession of, or importation into this state of, a large-capacity magazine by a sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or sworn federal law enforcement officer, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of that officer’s duties.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.3.)
-------------------------------------------

32406.

Subdivision (c) of Section 32310 does not apply to an honorably retired sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or honorably retired sworn federal law enforcement officer, who was authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of that officer’s duties. “Honorably retired” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 16690.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.4.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

32406.

Subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 32310 do not apply to the following:

(a) An individual who honorably retired from being a sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or an individual who honorably retired from being a sworn federal law enforcement officer, who was authorized to carry a firearm in the
 course and scope of that officer’s duties. For purposes of this section, “honorably retired” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16690.

(b) A federal, state, or local historical society, museum or institutional society, or museum or institutional collection, that is open to the public, provided that the large-capacity magazine is unloaded, properly housed within secured premises, and secured from unauthorized handling.

(c) A person who finds a large-capacity magazine, if the person is not prohibited from possessing firearms or ammunition, and possessed it no longer than necessary to deliver or transport it to the nearest law enforcement agency.

(d) A forensic laboratory, or an authorized agent or employee thereof in the course and scope of his or her authorized activities.

(e) The receipt or disposition of a large-capacity magazine by a trustee of a trust, or an executor or administrator of an estate, including an estate that is subject to probate, that includes a large-capacity magazine.

(f) A person lawfully in possession of a firearm that the person obtained prior to January 1, 2000, if no magazine that holds 10 or fewer rounds of ammunition is compatible with that firearm and the person possesses the large-capacity magazine solely for use with
 that firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (SB 1446)   Effective January 1, 2017.   See same-numbered section added November 8, 2016, by Proposition 63.)
-------------------------------------------

32410.

Section 32310 does not apply to the sale, purchase, or possession of any large-capacity magazine to or by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------

32415.

Section 32310 does not apply to the loan of a lawfully possessed large-capacity magazine between two individuals if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The person being loaned the large-capacity magazine is not prohibited by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code from possessing firearms or ammunition.

(b) The loan of the large-capacity magazine occurs at a place or location where the possession of the large-capacity magazine is not otherwise prohibited, and the
 person who lends the large-capacity magazine remains in the accessible vicinity of the person to whom the large-capacity magazine is loaned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

32425.

Section 32310 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) The lending or giving of any large-capacity magazine to a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, or to a gunsmith, for the purposes of maintenance, repair, or modification of that large-capacity magazine.

(b) The possession of any large-capacity magazine by a person specified in subdivision (a) for the purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The return to its owner of any large-capacity magazine by a person specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.7.)
-------------------------------------------

32430.

Section 32310 does not apply to the possession of, importation into this state of, or sale of, any large-capacity magazine by a person who has been issued a permit to engage in those activities pursuant to Section 32315, when those activities are in accordance with the terms and conditions of that permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 58, Sec. 8.   (SB 1446)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

32435.

Section 32310 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) The sale of, giving of, lending of, possession of, importation into this state of, or purchase of, any large-capacity magazine, to or by any entity that operates an armored vehicle business pursuant to the laws of this state.

(b) The lending of large-capacity magazines by an entity specified in subdivision (a) to its authorized employees, while in the course and scope of employment for purposes that pertain to the entity’s armored vehicle business.

(c) The possession of any large-capacity magazines by the employees of an entity specified in subdivision (a) for purposes that pertain
 to the entity’s armored vehicle business.

(d) The return of those large-capacity magazines to the entity specified in subdivision (a) by those employees specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 6.8.)
-------------------------------------------

32440.

Section 32310 does not apply to any of the following:

(a) The manufacture of a large-capacity magazine for any federal, state, county, city and county, or city agency that is charged with the enforcement of any law, for use by agency employees in the discharge of their official duties, whether on or off duty, and where the use is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of their duties.

(b) The manufacture of a large-capacity magazine for use by a sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of that officer’s duties.
